Tennessee statutes. Title 25 Judgments
Chapter 2

Confession of Judgment

25-2-101. Power given before action.

Any power of attorney or authority to confess judgment which is given before an action is instituted and before the service of process in such action, is declared void; and any judgment based on such power of attorney or authority is likewise declared void.

This section shall not affect any power of attorney or authority given after an action is instituted and after the service of process in such action.

Code 1932, § 8848; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-201.

Cross-References. Durable power of attorney, title 34, ch. 6, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, § 22; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 78.

Law Reviews.

Due Process — Confession of Judgment Procedures Are Not Unconstitutional Per Se, 25 Vand. L. Rev. 613.

25-2-102. Confession by surety.

No surety shall be permitted to confess judgment, or allow judgment to go by default, if the principal will be made a defendant to the suit, and tender to the surety, for the principal's indemnity, sufficient collateral security, to be approved by the court before whom the suit is pending.

Code 1858, § 3624 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 15, § 3); Shan., § 5389; Code 1932, § 9548; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-202.

Cross-References. Power of surety to move for judgment, §25-3-122.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 78; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.